South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S586.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Payment for committee members SECTION 1. SECTIONS 1 and 2 of Act 172 of 1995 are amended to read: SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each member of the Kershaw County Transportation Committee, in performance of his duties, shall be allowed and paid from Kershaw County "C" fund revenues the sum of ninety dollars for each meeting at which he is in attendance. The chairman of the committee shall be allowed and paid from Kershaw County "C" fund revenues the sum of one hundred seventy-five dollars for each meeting at which he is in attendance. SECTION 2. The Kershaw County Transportation Committee shall receive the payment authorized herein upon issuance of approved vouchers by its chairman; provided, however, the chairman may not approve vouchers in any single fiscal year which vouchers authorize payment for more than eighteen meetings per fiscal year for each member of the committee. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 25th day of February, 2026. Approved the 27th day of February, 2026. -- L. ----XX----